apertium-sme-sma.sma.lexc
LEXICON LEEJJEGE        !Sg+Nom=leejjege  Sg+Cmp=leejjeh-
 +N+Sg+Nom:ge%^DISIMP         FINAL1 ;
 +N+Sg+Acc:ge%>%^DISIMPm      FINAL1 ;
 +N+Sg+Gen:ge%>%^DISIMPn      FINAL1 ;
 +N+Sg+Ill:g%>asse            FINAL1 ; !Rule to delete Jesuse%>asse > Jesusasse
 +N+Sg+Ine:g%>isnie           FINAL1 ;
 +N+Sg+Ela:g%>istie           FINAL1 ;
 +N+Sg+Com:g%>inie            FINAL1 ;
 +N+Pl:g N_ODD_PL ;
 +N:g    N_ODD_ESS ;
  +N+SgNomCmp:h%^DISIMP            R ;
  +N+SgGenCmp:ge%>%^DISIMPn        R ;
  +N+PlGenCmp:g%>%^DISIMPi R ;
  +N+Der1+Der/Dim+N:g%»adtj GIERIEHTSADTJE ;
  


LEXICON DEAKEHKE        !Sg+Nom=deakehke/deakah  Sg+Cmp=deakehke-/deakah-
 +N+Sg+Nom:         FINAL1 ;
 +N+Sg+Acc:ke%>%^DISIMPm      FINAL1 ;
 +N+Sg+Gen:ke%>%^DISIMPn      FINAL1 ;
 +N+Sg+Ill:k%>asse            FINAL1 ; !Rule to delete Jesuse%>asse > Jesusasse
 +N+Sg+Ine:k%>isnie           FINAL1 ;
 +N+Sg+Ela:k%>istie           FINAL1 ;
 +N+Sg+Com:k%>inie            FINAL1 ;
 +N+Pl:k N_ODD_PL ;
 +N:k    N_ODD_ESS ;
  +N+SgNomCmp:            R ;
  +N+SgNomCmp:ke%^DISIMP            R ;
  +N+SgGenCmp:ke%>%^DISIMPn        R ;
  +N+PlGenCmp:k%>%^DISIMPi R ;
  +N+Der1+Der/Dim+N:k%»adtj GIERIEHTSADTJE ;


LEXICON ÅERUVE
 +N+Sg: ÅERUVE_SG ;
 +N+Pl: ÅERUVE_PL ;
 +N:    ÅERUVE_ESS ;
  +N+SgNomCmp:uve%^DISIMP            R ;
  +N+SgGenCmp:uve%>%^DISIMPn        R ;
  +N+PlGenCmp:uv%>%^DISIMPi R ;
  +N+Der1+Der/Dim+N:%»ievadtj GIERIEHTSADTJE ;


LEXICON ÅERUVE_SG
  +Nom:uve%^DISIMP         FINAL1 ;
  +Acc:uve%>%^DISIMPm      FINAL1 ;
  +Gen:uve%>%^DISIMPn      FINAL1 ;
 +Ill:iev%>asse            FINAL1 ; !Rule to delete Jesuse%>asse > Jesusasse
  +Ine:iev%>isnie           FINAL1 ;
  +Ela:iev%>istie           FINAL1 ;
  +Com:iev%>inie            FINAL1 ;

LEXICON ÅERUVE_PL
  +Nom:uv%>%^DISIMPh       FINAL1 ;
  +Acc:iev%>idie            FINAL1 ;
  +Gen:uv%>%^DISIMPi       FINAL1 ;
  +Ill:iev%>idie            FINAL1 ;
  +Ine:iev%>inie            FINAL1 ;
  +Ela:iev%>ijstie          FINAL1 ;
  +Com:uve%>%^DISIMPigujmie FINAL1 ;
 +Com+Use/Sub:uve%>%^DISIMPigyjmie FINAL1 ; !
  
LEXICON ÅERUVE_ESS
  +Ess:iev%>inie          FINAL1 ;

LEXICON BÅERUVE
 +N+Sg: BÅERUVE_SG ;
 +N+Pl: BÅERUVE_PL ;
 +N:    BÅERUVE_ESS ;
  +N+SgNomCmp:uve%^DISIMP            R ;
  +N+SgGenCmp:uve%>%^DISIMPn        R ;
  +N+PlGenCmp:uv%>%^DISIMPi R ;
  +N+Der1+Der/Dim+N:%»ievadtj GIERIEHTSADTJE ;

LEXICON BÅERUVE_SG
  +Nom:uve%^DISIMP         FINAL1 ;
  +Nom+PxSg1:uv%>amme FINAL1 ;
  +Nom+PxSg2:uv%>adth FINAL1 ;
  +Acc:uve%>%^DISIMPm      FINAL1 ;
  +Acc+PxSg2:uv%>amth FINAL1 ;
  +Gen:uve%>%^DISIMPn      FINAL1 ;
  +Gen+PxSg1:uv%>anne FINAL1 ;
  +Gen+PxSg2:uv%>anne FINAL1 ;
  +Gen+PxSg3:uv%>anne FINAL1 ;
 +Ill:uev%>asse            FINAL1 ; !Rule to delete Jesuse%>asse > Jesusasse
  +Ill+PxSg2:uv%>assedh FINAL1 ;
  +Ine:uev%>isnie           FINAL1 ;
  +Ela:uev%>istie           FINAL1 ;
  +Com:uev%>inie            FINAL1 ;
  +Com+PxSg2:uv%>æjnedh FINAL1 ;


LEXICON BÅERUVE_PL
  +Nom:uv%>%^DISIMPh       FINAL1 ;
  +Acc:uev%>idie            FINAL1 ;
  +Gen:uv%>%^DISIMPi       FINAL1 ;
  +Ill:uev%>idie            FINAL1 ;
  +Ine:uev%>inie            FINAL1 ;
  +Ela:uev%>ijstie          FINAL1 ;
  +Com:uve%>%^DISIMPigujmie FINAL1 ;
 +Com+Use/Sub:uve%>%^DISIMPigyjmie FINAL1 ; !
  
LEXICON BÅERUVE_ESS
  +Ess:uev%>inie          FINAL1 ;

LEXICON BÅERUJE
 +N+Sg: BÅERUJE_SG ;
 +N+Pl: BÅERUJE_PL ;
 +N:    BÅERUJE_ESS ;
  +N+SgNomCmp:uje%^DISIMP            R ;
  +N+SgGenCmp:uje%>%^DISIMPn        R ;
  +N+PlGenCmp:uj%>%^DISIMPi R ;
  +N+Der1+Der/Dim+N:%»iejadtj GIERIEHTSADTJE ;


LEXICON BÅERUJE_SG
  +Nom:uje%^DISIMP         FINAL1 ;
  +Acc:uje%>%^DISIMPm      FINAL1 ;
  +Gen:uje%>%^DISIMPn      FINAL1 ;
 +Ill:iej%>asse            FINAL1 ; !Rule to delete Jesuse%>asse > Jesusasse
  +Ine:iej%>isnie           FINAL1 ;
  +Ela:iej%>istie           FINAL1 ;
  +Com:iej%>inie            FINAL1 ;

LEXICON BÅERUJE_PL
  +Nom:uj%>%^DISIMPh       FINAL1 ;
  +Acc:iej%>idie            FINAL1 ;
  +Gen:uj%>%^DISIMPi       FINAL1 ;
  +Ill:iej%>idie            FINAL1 ;
  +Ine:iej%>inie            FINAL1 ;
  +Ela:iej%>ijstie          FINAL1 ;
  +Com:uje%>%^DISIMPigujmie FINAL1 ;
 +Com+Use/Sub:uje%>%^DISIMPigyjmie FINAL1 ; !

LEXICON BÅERUJE_ESS
  +Ess:iej%>inie          FINAL1 ;

LEXICON IJE_ODD
 +N+Sg: IJE_ODD_SG ;
 +N+Pl: IJE_ODD_PL ;
 +N:    IJE_ODD_ESS ;
  +N+SgNomCmp:e%^NOMAGieDISIMP            R ;
  +N+SgGenCmp:e%>%^NOMAGieDISIMPn        R ;
  +N+PlGenCmp:%>%^NOMAGieDISIMPi R ;
  +N+Der1+Der/Dim+N:%»adtj GIERIEHTSADTJE ;


LEXICON IJE_ODD_SG
  +Nom:e%^NOMAGieDISIMP         FINAL1 ;
  +Nom+PxSg1:%>amme FINAL1 ;
  +Nom+PxSg2:%>adth FINAL1 ;
  +Acc:e%>%^NOMAGieDISIMPm      FINAL1 ;
  +Acc+PxSg2:%>amth FINAL1 ;
  +Gen:e%>%^NOMAGieDISIMPn      FINAL1 ;
  +Gen+PxSg1:%>anne FINAL1 ;
  +Gen+PxSg2:%>anne FINAL1 ;
  +Gen+PxSg3:%>anne FINAL1 ;
 +Ill:%>asse            FINAL1 ; !Rule to delete Jesuse%>asse > Jesusasse
  +Ill+PxSg2:%>assedh FINAL1 ;
  +Ine:%>isnie           FINAL1 ;
  +Ela:%>istie           FINAL1 ;
  +Com:%>inie            FINAL1 ;
  +Com+PxSg2:%>æjnedh FINAL1 ;


LEXICON IJE_ODD_PL
  +Nom:%>%^NOMAGieDISIMPh       FINAL1 ;
  +Acc:%>idie            FINAL1 ;
  +Gen:%>%^NOMAGieDISIMPi       FINAL1 ;
  +Ill:%>idie            FINAL1 ;
  +Ine:%>inie            FINAL1 ;
  +Ela:%>ijstie          FINAL1 ;
  +Com:%>%^NOMAGieDISIMPigujmie FINAL1 ;
 +Com+Use/Sub:%>%^NOMAGieDISIMPigyjmie FINAL1 ; !
  
LEXICON IJE_ODD_ESS
  +Ess:%>inie          FINAL1 ;
  
LEXICON DAKTERE
  +N+Der1+Der/Rec+N: LAAHKOEH_ODD ;
  +N+Sg: N_ODD_SG ;
  +N+Pl: N_ODD_PL ;
  +N:    N_ODD_ESS ;
  +N+SgNomCmp:e%^DISIMP            R ;
  +N+SgGenCmp:e%>%^DISIMPn        R ;
  +N+PlGenCmp:%>%^DISIMPi R ;
  +N+Der1+Der/Dim+N:%»adtj GIERIEHTSADTJE ;

LEXICON ÅABPETJH
  +N+Pl+Nom:%>%^DISIMPh       FINAL1 ;
  +N+Pl+Acc:%>idie            FINAL1 ;
  +N+Pl+Gen:%>%^DISIMPi       FINAL1 ;
  +N+Pl+Ill:%>idie            FINAL1 ;
  +N+Pl+Ine:%>inie            FINAL1 ;
  +N+Pl+Ela:%>ijstie          FINAL1 ;
  +N+Pl+Com:%>%^DISIMPigujmie FINAL1 ;
  +N+Pl+Com+Use/Sub:%>%^DISIMPigyjmie FINAL1 ; !
  +N+Ess:%>inie          FINAL1 ;
  +N+SgNomCmp:e%^DISIMP            R ;
  +N+PlGenCmp:%>%^DISIMPi R ;
  +N+Der1+Der/Dim+N+Pl:%»adtj NIEJTE_PL ;
  +N+Der1+Der/Dim+N:%»adtj EVEN_ESS ;
  +N+Der1+Der/Dim+N+SgNomCmp:%»adtje    R ;
  +N+Der1+Der/Dim+N+PlGenCmp:%»adtj%>i  R ;



! Inflection for nouns ending in '-ie'
! ------------------------------------

LEXICON N_IE
  +N+Sg: N_IE_SG ;
  +N+Pl: N_IE_PL ;
  +N:    N_IE_ESS ;
  +N+SgNomCmp:ie              R ;
  +N+SgGenCmp:ie%>n           R ;
  +N+PlGenCmp:ie%>j           R ;
  +N+PlGenCmp+Uml:%>%^iUMLi R ;
  +N+Der1+Der/Dim+N:%^aLATUS%»tj GÅATETJE ;
  +N+Der1+Der/ijes+A+Pred:%»%^1UMLijes FINAL1 ;
  +N+Der1+Der/ijes:%»%^1UMLijes        ATTR-0 ;
  +N+Der1+Der/ijes:%»%^1UMLij          ODDCOMP ;
  
LEXICON N_IE_SG
  +Nom:ie                  FINAL1 ;
  +Nom+Uml+PxSg1:%>%^1UMLeme FINAL1 ;
  +Nom+Uml+PxSg2:%>%^1UMLedh FINAL1 ;
  +Nom+Uml+PxSg3:e%>se FINAL1 ;
  +Acc:ie%>m               FINAL1 ;
  +Acc+Uml+PxSg1:%>%^1UMLeme FINAL1 ;
  +Acc+Uml+PxSg2:%>%^1UMLemdh FINAL1 ;
  +Acc+PxSg3:e%>mse FINAL1 ;
  +Gen:ie%>n               FINAL1 ;
  +Ill+Uml:%>%^1UMLan      FINAL1 ;
  +Ill+Uml+PxSg1:%>%^1UMLasanne FINAL1 ;
  +Ill+Uml+PxSg2:%>%^1UMLasadth FINAL1 ;
  +Ine:e%>sne              FINAL1 ;
  +Ela:e%>ste              FINAL1 ;
  +Ela+PxSg1:ie%>stanne FINAL1 ;
  +Com:%>ine               FINAL1 ;
  +Com+Uml+PxSg2:%>%^1UMLanadth FINAL1 ;


LEXICON N_IE_PL
  +Nom:ie%>h               FINAL1 ;
  +Acc:%>ide               FINAL1 ;
  +Gen:ie%>j               FINAL1 ;
  +Ill:%>ide               FINAL1 ;
  +Ine:%>ine               FINAL1 ;
  +Ela:%>ijste             FINAL1 ;
  +Com:ie%>jgujmie         FINAL1 ;
 +Com+Uml+Use/Sub:%>%^iUMLigyjmie FINAL1 ; !
 +Com+Use/Sub:ie%>jgyjmie         FINAL1 ; !
  +Com+Uml:%>%^iUMLigujmie FINAL1 ;

LEXICON N_IE_ESS
  +Ess:%>ine                  FINAL1 ;

LEXICON Noun
aajkohke+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:aajkoehk DAKTERE ; !
aamhtese#gïetedallije+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:aamhtese#gïetedallij IJE_ODD ; !
aarpije+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:aarpij IJE_ODD ; !
aejkie+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft:aejk N_IE ; !
aerpie:aerp N_IE ;
baakoe#guvvie:baakoe#guvv N_IE ;
baernie+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:baern N_IE ; !
baetie:baet N_IE ;
barkoe#dåehkie+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:barkoe#dåehk N_IE ; !
biejjie+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:biejj N_IE ; !
bietsie:biets N_IE ;
buehkie+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:buehk N_IE ; !
daebrie:daebr N_IE ;
daelvie+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:daelv N_IE ; !
doekije+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:doekij IJE_ODD ; !
dulvie:dulv N_IE ;
dååjrehtimmie:dååjrehtimm N_IE ;
elmie+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:elm N_IE ; !
evtiedimmie:evtiedimm N_IE ;
faage#suerkie:faage#suerk N_IE ;
gaagkije+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:gaagkij IJE_ODD ; !
gaedtie+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:gaedt N_IE ; !
gaejpie:gaejp N_IE ;
garre#laejpie:garre#laejp N_IE ;
gaske#viermie:gaske#vierm N_IE "nät, fiskenät" ;
gernie:gern N_IE ;
govkije:govkij IJE_ODD ;
guedtije+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:guedtiej IJE_ODD ; !
guelie+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:guel N_IE ; !
guhtsije+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:guhtsiej IJE_ODD ; !
gåetie+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:gået N_IE ; !
gïjre#daelvie+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:gïjre#daelv N_IE ; !
haerhpie:haerhp N_IE ;
haerrie+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:haerr N_IE ; !
hievnie+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:hievn N_IE ; !
jaepie+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:jaep N_IE ; !
jielie#guvvie:jielie#guvv N_IE ;
jiermie:jierm N_IE ;
laejpie:laejp N_IE ;
lahtestimmie:lahtestimm N_IE ;
ledtie+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:ledt N_IE ; !
liejpie:liejp N_IE ;
maana#vaarjelimmie:maana#vaarjelimm N_IE ;
mielhkie:mielhk N_IE ;
mueksie:mueks N_IE ;
måerie:måer N_IE ;
nielkie:nielk N_IE ;
njaelmie:njaelm N_IE ;
pluevie+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:pluev N_IE ; !
prutnie:prutn N_IE ;
raejrie+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:raejr N_IE ; !
saejtie+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:saejt N_IE ; !
saemie+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:saem N_IE ; !
sijjie+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:sijj N_IE ; !
skaavhte#baenie:skaavhte#baen N_IE ;
snjuhtjie:snjuhtj N_IE ;
soelkehtimmie:soelkehtimm N_IE ;
staellie:staell N_IE ;
straejmie+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:straejm N_IE ; !
suelnie+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:sueln N_IE ; !
såekie:såek N_IE ;
tjaetsie+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:tjaets N_IE ; !
tjelmie:tjelm N_IE ;
tjirkije+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:tjirkij IJE_ODD ; !
tsåekie:tsåek N_IE ;
viehkie#vierhtie:viehkie#vierht N_IE ;
tjöödtjestimmie#sijjie:tjöödtjestimmie#sijj N_IE ;
åarjel#saemie+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:åarjel#saem N_IE ; !
åedtjie:åedtj N_IE ;
miehtjie+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:miehtj N_IE ; !
